Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,118
Variation by corporate action; application
of subchapter.

(MBCA
8.58) (a) A corporation may, by a provision in its articles of incorporation
or bylaws or in a resolution adopted or a contract approved by its board of
directors or shareholders, obligate itself in advance of the act or omission
giving rise to a proceeding to provide indemnification in accordance with
section 21-2,111 or advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance
with section 21-2,113. Any such obligatory provision shall be deemed to satisfy
the requirements for authorization referred to in subsection (c) of section
21-2,113 and in subsection (c) of section 21-2,115. Any such provision that
obligates the corporation to provide indemnification to the fullest extent
permitted by law shall be deemed to obligate the corporation to advance funds
to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with section 21-2,113 to the
fullest extent permitted by law, unless the provision specifically provides
otherwise.

(b) A right of indemnification
or to advances for expenses created by sections 21-2,110 to 21-2,119 or under
subsection (a) of this section and in effect at the time of an act or omission
shall not be eliminated or impaired with respect to such act or omission by
an amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws or a resolution of
the directors or shareholders, adopted after the occurrence of such act or
omission, unless, in the case of a right created under subsection (a) of this
section, the provision creating such right and in effect at the time of such
act or omission explicitly authorizes such elimination or impairment after
such act or omission has occurred.

(c) Any provision pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall not obligate the corporation to indemnify or advance expenses
to a director of a predecessor of the corporation, pertaining to conduct with
respect to the predecessor, unless otherwise specifically provided. Any provision
for indemnification or advance for expenses in the articles of incorporation,
bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors or shareholders of a predecessor
of the corporation in a merger or in a contract to which the predecessor is
a party existing at the time the merger takes effect shall be governed by
subdivision (a)(4) of section 21-2,167.

(d) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a corporation
may, by a provision in its articles of incorporation, limit any of the rights
to indemnification or advance for expenses created by or pursuant to sections
21-2,110 to 21-2,119.

(e)
Sections 21-2,110 to 21-2,119 do not limit a corporation's power to pay or
reimburse expenses incurred by a director or an officer in connection with
appearing as a witness in a proceeding at a time when he or she is not a party.

(f) Sections 21-2,110
to 21-2,119 do not limit a corporation's power to indemnify, advance expenses
to, or provide or maintain insurance on behalf of an employee or agent.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 118.
January 1, 2016